Idaho, session 2025, S1209.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities and the
Office of the State Board of Education the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. BOISE STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,374,100 $1,374,100
II. IDAHO STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,895,400 $1,895,400


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
CharitableInstitutionsEndowmentIncome
Fund 60,100 60,100
NormalSchoolEndowmentIncome
Fund 173,600 173,600
TOTAL $2,129,100 $2,129,100
III. LEWIS-CLARK STATE COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $572,400 $572,400
NormalSchoolEndowmentIncome
Fund 0 $255,000 255,000
TOTAL $572,400 $255,000 $827,400
IV. UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $996,300 $996,300
AgriculturalCollegeEndowmentIncome
Fund $109,200 109,200
ScientificSchoolEndowmentIncome
Fund 362,400 362,400
University Endowment Income
Fund 0 428,400 428,400
TOTAL $996,300 $900,000 $1,896,300
V. SYSTEMWIDE PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,500 $996,100 $1,003,600
GRAND TOTAL $5,079,400 $2,151,100 $7,230,500
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the State Board of Education and the Board of Re-
gents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities and the Office
of the State Board of Education is hereby reduced by the following amounts


for operating expenditures according to the designated programs from the
General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Boise State University $2,000,000
University of Idaho 2,000,000
TOTAL $4,000,000
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the State Board of Education and the Board of Re-
gents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities and the Office
of the State Board of Education from the General Fund is hereby reduced by
$57,800 for operating expenditures for the University of Idaho for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. TRANSPARENCY AND LEGISLATIVE OVERSIGHT OF ICOM NEGOTIA-
TIONS. Idaho State University, under the oversight of the State Board of
Education and the Legislature, shall lead any negotiations that may result
in the acquisition or proposed acquisition of the Idaho College of Osteo-
pathic Medicine (ICOM). Idaho State University and the Office of the State
Board of Education shall provide information regarding the acquisition or
proposed acquisition of ICOM at the request of the Legislative Services
Office. Requested information may include but is not limited to current or
historical financial data, operational data, correspondences, draft agree-
ments, and briefing materials. Except as otherwise required by law, no state
officer, board member, or employee may enter into a non-disclosure agreement
or any contract that conflicts with this section.
SECTION 5. PRIORITIZING WATER RESEARCH IN IDAHO HIGHER EDUCATION. Of
the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act for Systemwide Program,
$1,000,000 shall be used for the Idaho Water Resources Research Institute
(IWRRI). Expenditure of these funds shall be at the direction of the IWRRI
Executive Committee consistent with the Institute's research priorities.
IWRRI shall encourage rigorous, actionable water research at all of Idaho's
public institutions of higher learning and shall fund research projects
accordingly. The IWRRI Director shall submit an interim report to the Joint
Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 1, 2025, and an end-of-fiscal
year report by June 30, 2026 on the expenditure of these funds. The format
and content of this report will be determined in consultation with the Budget
and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 6. TRANSITIONING TO OUTCOMES-BASED FUNDING IN HIGHER EDU-
CATION. The Office of the State Board of Education shall develop an out-
comes-based funding model to replace the Enrollment Workload Adjustment
for Idaho's college and universities. The Office of the State Board shall
deliver a written proposal to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by
December 31, 2025, with a plan for implementation of the new funding model
in fiscal year 2028 or earlier. The Office of the State Board of Education
shall provide written reports to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
on a quarterly basis detailing progress towards the outcomes-based funding


model. The format and content of this report will be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 7. DEI AUDITS. The Legislative Audits Division of the Legisla-
tive Services Office will audit Boise State University, Idaho State Univer-
sity, Lewis-Clark State College, and the University of Idaho for compliance
with those portions of Idaho Code prohibiting or relating to diversity, eq-
uity, and inclusion in higher education. Legislative Audits will bill the
respective institutions for these audits. The Legislative Audits Division
will report its findings to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by
December 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. REDUCTIONS IN APPROPRIATION. Of the reductions included in
Section 2 of this act for Boise State University and the University of Idaho,
amounts are reduced on a onetime basis, and the institutions are permitted
to restore such reductions to the base appropriation in the following year's
budget submission required by Section 67-3502, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.